Louisiana, session 2026, HB851.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2531(A)(4) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
30:2531(A)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2531. Intentional littering prohibited; criminal penalties; simple littering
prohibited; civil penalties; special court costs
A. Intentional littering.
* * *
(4) Whoever violates the provisions of this Subsection by intentionally
releasing a balloon or by organizing an event that includes a planned, intentional
release of twelve or more balloons is subject to the penalties provided in Paragraph
(A)(2) of this Subsection.
(a) The provisions of this Subsection shall not apply to the following:
(i) Persons under the age of seventeen.
(ii) The negligent or unintentional release of a balloon.
(iii) The release of a balloon indoors.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 851 ENROLLED
(iv) The release of a balloon made of biodegradable or photobiodegradable
material.
(v) The release of a balloon for scientific or meteorological purposes by or
on behalf of a governmental agency, under a governmental contract, or by an
educational institution.
(vi) The release of a balloon that is attached to a radio tracking device by a
person who holds a valid amateur radio operator license.
(vii) A hot air balloon that is recovered after launch.
(b) For purposes of this Subsection, the intentional release of multiple
balloons at a single event, location, or time is a single violation.
(4)(5) A violation of this Subsection shall be cited within one year of the
date on which law enforcement knew or reasonably should have known of the
commission of the act.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.